Mississippi, session 2026, SB2813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-3-104, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-104.  (1)  It is unlawful for any jailer, guard, employee of the Department of Corrections, sheriff, constable, marshal, other officer, or employee of a law enforcement agency or correctional facility to engage in any sexual penetration, as defined in Section 97-3-97, or other sexual act with * * * any offender a person, with the * * * offender's person's consent, who is: (a) Incarcerated at any jail or any state, county or private correctional facility * * * or who is; (b)  Serving on probation, parole, earned-release supervision, post-release supervision, earned probation, intensive supervision or any other form of correctional supervision * * *.; or (c)  Detained, arrested or otherwise in custody. (2)  It is unlawful for any civilian with supervisory or custodial authority over * * * an offender a person to engage in any sexual penetration, as defined in Section 97-3-97, or other sexual act with * * * the offender that person, with the * * * offender's person's consent, who is: (a)  Incarcerated at any jail or any state, county or private correctional facility * * *.; (b)  Serving on probation, parole, earned-release supervision, post-release supervision, earned probation, intensive supervision or any other form of correctional supervision; or (c)  Detained, arrested or otherwise in custody. (3)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned for a term not to exceed five (5) years, or both. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.